Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.071

Reservation of name.

A person may reserve the exclusive right to the use of a limited partnership name in accordance with RCW 23.95.310.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6103; 2009 c 188 s 109.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.